New York, session 2025-2026, A9330.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 404-b of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 277 of the laws of 1991, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 5 in the same manner as other number plates [upon payment of the regular 6 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this chapter 7 and an initial one time service charge of fifteen dollars], provided, 8 however, that no registration fee or service charge shall be charged 9 for such plate. 10 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 404 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 11 amended by section 21 of part G of chapter 59 of the laws of 2009, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 1. The commissioner may issue special number plates to applicants 14 therefor in the same manner as other number plates are issued pursuant 15 to this article. Such special number plates shall be issued only upon 16 payment of an annual service charge of thirty-one dollars and twenty- 17 five cents in addition to the regular fee prescribed by section four 18 hundred one of this article. Application for special number plates shall 19 be made in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner 20 with respect to issuance of such number plates. Provided, however, in 21 lieu of the annual fee specified herein, the commissioner may establish 22 specific categories of plates for which an annual fee of not less than 23 eighteen dollars and seventy-five cents nor more than thirty-one dollars 24 and twenty-five cents may be charged subject to the approval of the 25 director of the division of the budget. Notwithstanding any other EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05379-01-5 A. 9330 2 1 provision of this section, the annual service charge shall not apply to 2 the issuance of special number plates to volunteer firefighters pursuant 3 to section four hundred four-b of this article. Notwithstanding any 4 inconsistent provision of this section, the difference collected between 5 the special plates fee or service charge set forth in this subdivision 6 in effect on and after September first, two thousand nine and the 7 special plates fee or service charge set forth in this subdivision in 8 effect prior to such date shall be deposited to the credit of the dedi- 9 cated highway and bridge trust fund. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.